Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-156
National Guard; dishonorable discharge; effect; posting.

A dishonorable discharge from service in the Nebraska National Guard shall operate as a complete expulsion from the guard, a forfeiture of all exemptions and privileges acquired through membership therein, and disqualification for any military service under the state. The names of all persons dishonorably discharged shall be published in orders by the Adjutant General quarterly.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 27, p. 663;

C.S.1929, § 55-133;

R.S.1943, § 55-134;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 54, p. 1599.